data/hungarian.aff
SFX I   ak   aiig         ak                        [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_3]+[TERM]
SFX I   ak   aihoz        ak                        [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_3]+[ALL]
SFX I   ak   aidéért      ak                        [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[CAUS/FIN]
SFX I   ak   aidévá       ak                        [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[TRANS]
SFX I   ak   aidéval      ak                        [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[INSTR]
SFX I   ak   aidéul       ak                        [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[ESS]
SFX I   ak   aidétól      ak                        [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[ABL]
SFX I   ak   aidét        ak                        [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[ACC]
SFX I   ak   aidéról      ak                        [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[DEL]
SFX I   ak   aidért       ak                        [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_2]+[CAUS/FIN]
SFX I   ak   aidéra       ak                        [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[SBL]
SFX I   ak   aidénál      ak                        [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[ADE]
SFX I   ak   aidénak      ak                        [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[DAT]
SFX I   ak   aidén        ak                        [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[SUE]
SFX I   ak   aidéiért     ak                        [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[CAUS/FIN]
SFX I   ak   aidéivá      ak                        [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[TRANS]
SFX I   ak   aidéival     ak                        [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[INSTR]
SFX I   ak   aidéiul      ak                        [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[ESS]
SFX I   ak   aidéitól     ak                        [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[ABL]
SFX I   ak   aidéit       ak                        [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[ACC]
SFX I   ak   aidéiról     ak                        [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[DEL]
SFX I   ak   aidéira      ak                        [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[SBL]
SFX I   ak   aidéinál     ak                        [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[ADE]
SFX I   ak   aidéinak     ak                        [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[DAT]
SFX I   ak   aidéin       ak                        [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[SUE]
SFX I   ak   aidéiig      ak                        [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[TERM]
SFX I   ak   aidéihoz     ak                        [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[ALL]
SFX I   ak   aidéig       ak                        [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[TERM]
SFX I   ak   aidéiból     ak                        [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[ELA]
SFX I   ak   aidéiban     ak                        [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[INE]
SFX I   ak   aidéiba      ak                        [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[ILL]
SFX I   ak   aidéi        ak                        [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[NOM]
SFX I   ak   aidéhoz      ak                        [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[ALL]
SFX I   ak   aidéból      ak                        [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[ELA]
SFX I   ak   aidéban      ak                        [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[INE]
SFX I   ak   aidéba       ak                        [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[ILL]
SFX I   ak   aidé         ak                        [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[NOM]
SFX I   ak   aidul        ak                        [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_2]+[ESS]
SFX I   ak   aidtól       ak                        [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_2]+[ABL]
SFX I   ak   aidról       ak                        [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_2]+[DEL]
SFX I   ak   aidra        ak                        [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_2]+[SBL]
SFX I   ak   aidon        ak                        [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_2]+[SUE]
SFX I   ak   aidnál       ak                        [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_2]+[ADE]
SFX I   ak   aidnak       ak                        [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_2]+[DAT]
SFX I   ak   aidként      ak                        [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_2]+[FORM]
SFX I   ak   aidkor       ak                        [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_2]+[TEMP]
SFX I   ak   aidig        ak                        [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_2]+[TERM]
SFX I   ak   aidhoz       ak                        [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_2]+[ALL]
SFX I   ak   aiddá        ak                        [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_2]+[TRANS]
SFX I   ak   aiddal       ak                        [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_2]+[INSTR]
SFX I   ak   aidból       ak                        [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_2]+[ELA]
SFX I   ak   aidban       ak                        [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_2]+[INE]
SFX I   ak   aidba        ak                        [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_2]+[ILL]
SFX I   ak   aidat        ak                        [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_2]+[ACC]
SFX I   ak   aid          ak                        [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_2]+[NOM]
SFX I   ak   aiból        ak                        [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_3]+[ELA]
SFX I   ak   aiban        ak                        [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_3]+[INE]
SFX I   ak   aiba         ak                        [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_3]+[ILL]
SFX I   ak   ai           ak                        [PLUR]+[POSS_SG_3]+[NOM]
SFX I   ak   adéért       ak                        [POSS_SG_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[CAUS/FIN]
SFX I   ak   adévá        ak                        [POSS_SG_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[TRANS]
SFX I   ak   adéval       ak                        [POSS_SG_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[INSTR]
SFX I   ak   adéul        ak                        [POSS_SG_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[ESS]
SFX I   ak   adétól       ak                        [POSS_SG_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[ABL]
SFX I   ak   adét         ak                        [POSS_SG_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[ACC]
SFX I   ak   adéról       ak                        [POSS_SG_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[DEL]
SFX I   ak   adért        ak                        [POSS_SG_2]+[CAUS/FIN]
SFX I   ak   adéra        ak                        [POSS_SG_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[SBL]
SFX I   ak   adénál       ak                        [POSS_SG_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[ADE]
SFX I   ak   adénak       ak                        [POSS_SG_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[DAT]
SFX I   ak   adén         ak                        [POSS_SG_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[SUE]
SFX I   ak   adéiért      ak                        [POSS_SG_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[CAUS/FIN]
SFX I   ak   adéivá       ak                        [POSS_SG_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[TRANS]
SFX I   ak   adéival      ak                        [POSS_SG_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[INSTR]
SFX I   ak   adéiul       ak                        [POSS_SG_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[ESS]
SFX I   ak   adéitól      ak                        [POSS_SG_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[ABL]
SFX I   ak   adéit        ak                        [POSS_SG_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[ACC]
SFX I   ak   adéiról      ak                        [POSS_SG_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[DEL]
SFX I   ak   adéira       ak                        [POSS_SG_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[SBL]
SFX I   ak   adéinál      ak                        [POSS_SG_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[ADE]
SFX I   ak   adéinak      ak                        [POSS_SG_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[DAT]
SFX I   ak   adéin        ak                        [POSS_SG_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[SUE]
SFX I   ak   adéiig       ak                        [POSS_SG_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[TERM]
SFX I   ak   adéihoz      ak                        [POSS_SG_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[ALL]
SFX I   ak   adéig        ak                        [POSS_SG_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[TERM]
SFX I   ak   adéiból      ak                        [POSS_SG_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[ELA]
SFX I   ak   adéiban      ak                        [POSS_SG_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[INE]
SFX I   ak   adéiba       ak                        [POSS_SG_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[ILL]
SFX I   ak   adéi         ak                        [POSS_SG_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[NOM]
SFX I   ak   adéhoz       ak                        [POSS_SG_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[ALL]
SFX I   ak   adéból       ak                        [POSS_SG_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[ELA]
SFX I   ak   adéban       ak                        [POSS_SG_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[INE]
