data/hungarian.dic
véknyak/Ixş	véknya[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
százezrek/I	százezer[adj_num]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
nyolcvanhetek/Ibh	nyolcvanhét[adj_num]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
negyvenhetek/Ibh	negyvenhét[adj_num]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
kilencvenkettőezrek/Ib	kilencvenkettőezer[adj_num]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
igazak/Ix	igaz
hétszázezrek/I	hétszázezer[adj_num]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
huszonhatezrek/Ib	huszonhatezer[adj_num]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
hatvannégyezrek/Ib	hatvannégyezer[adj_num]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
harmincnyolcezrek/Ib	harmincnyolcezer[adj_num]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
ezrek/gIxb	ezer[adj_num]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
ütőerek/IóÍžĆćşx	ütőér[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
összjövedelmek/IóÍžJĆćş´x	összjövedelem[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
ökörnyálak/IóÍžĆćşx	ökörnyál[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
óbirodalmak/IóÍžJĆćş´x	óbirodalom[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
épkézlábak/IóÍžĆćşx	épkézláb[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
árvalányhajak/IóÍžĆćşx	árvalányhaj[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
állóvizek/IóÍžĆćşx	állóvíz[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
ágytálak/IóÍžĆćşx	ágytál[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
zárak/IóÍžĆćşx	zár[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
vödrök/IóÍžJĆćş´x	vödör[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
vívótermek/IóÍžJĆćş´x	vívóterem[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
védőfalak/IóÍžĆćşx	védőfal[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
váltólázak/IóÍžĆćşx	váltóláz[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
vizsgatermek/IóÍžJĆćş´x	vizsgaterem[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
vezetéklovak/wIóÍžĆćşx	vezetékló[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
vadászsólymok/IóÍžJĆćş´x	vadászsólyom[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
tölténytárak/IóÍžĆćşx	tölténytár[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
toloncházak/IóÍžĆćşx	toloncház[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
telitalpak/IóÍžĆćşx	telitalp[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
súrlókövek/IóÍžĆćşx	súrlókő[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
színvonalak/IóÍžĆćşx	színvonal[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
szájpeckek/IóÍžJĆćş´x	szájpecek[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
szerelvényfalak/IóÍžĆćşx	szerelvényfal[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
szavak/IóÍžĆćşx	szó[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
sorszámnevek/IóÍžĆćşx	sorszámnév[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
salátástálak/IóÍžĆćşx	salátástál[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
rezek/IóÍžĆćşx	réz[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
pénztárak/IóÍžĆćşx	pénztár[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
pisztolyagyak/IóÍžĆćşx	pisztolyagy[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
ostromzárak/IóÍžĆćşx	ostromzár[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
nyüvek/IóÍžĆćşx	nyű[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
nortonkutak/IóÍžĆćşx	nortonkút[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
műkövek/IóÍžĆćşx	műkő[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
mozgásterek/IóÍžĆćşx	mozgástér[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
mellékvonalak/IóÍžĆćşx	mellékvonal[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
macskakövek/IóÍžĆćşx	macskakő[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
lágyvasak/IóÍžĆćşx	lágyvas[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
lelencházak/IóÍžĆćşx	lelencház[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
kövek/IóÍžĆćşx	kő[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
kőhalmok/IóÍžJĆćş´x	kőhalom[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
kutatótornyok/IóÍžJĆćş´x	kutatótorony[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
komiszkenyerek/IóÍžĆćşx	komiszkenyér[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
kincsestárak/IóÍžĆćşx	kincsestár[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
kengyelszíjak/IóÍžĆćşx	kengyelszíj[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
kanárimadarak/IóÍžĆćşx	kanárimadár[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
jelszavak/IóÍžĆćşx	jelszó[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
igenevek/IóÍžĆćşx	igenév[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
hátaslovak/IóÍžĆćşx	hátasló[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
hideghengerművek/IóÍžĆćşx	hideghengermű[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
hanyattegerek/IóÍžĆćşx	hanyattegér[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
habszegfüvek/IóÍžĆćşx	habszegfű[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
gyötrelmek/IóÍžJĆćş´x	gyötrelem[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
gurítókerekek/IóÍžĆćşx	gurítókerék[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
földesurak/IóÍžĆćşx	földesúr[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
fulminsavak/IóÍžĆćşx	fulminsav[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
figyelmek/IóÍžJĆćş´x	figyelem[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
fegyverraktárak/IóÍžĆćşx	fegyverraktár[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
eozinmázak/IóÍžĆćşx	eozinmáz[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
ebszékfüvek/IóÍžĆćşx	ebszékfű[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
desszertestálak/IóÍžĆćşx	desszertestál[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
csonthéjak/IóÍžĆćşx	csonthéj[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
cipészfonalak/IóÍžĆćşx	cipészfonál[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
békakövek/IóÍžĆćşx	békakő[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
bogarak/IóÍžĆćşx	bogár[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
barnaszenek/IóÍžĆćşx	barnaszén[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
aranyközéputak/wIóÍžĆćşx	aranyközépút[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
akasztóhorgok/IóÍžJĆćş´x	akasztóhorog[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
Herceghalmok/IóÍžJĆćş´x	Herceghalom[noun]{+[PLUR]+[NOM]}
